Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-144
Poor person; duties of county where found and county of legal settlement.

If any person shall become chargeable in any county in which he or she has not established a legal settlement at the time of applying for aid, he or she shall be duly taken care of by the proper authority of the county where he or she may be found. It shall be the duty of the clerk of the county board to send a notice by mail to the clerk of the county board of the county in which such poor person has a legal settlement that such person has become chargeable as a poor person, and requesting the authorities of such county to promptly remove such poor person and to pay the expense accrued in taking care of him or her.

Laws 1983, LB 604, § 14.